District of Columbia statutes.
44-1004.05

Rights independent and nonwaivable.

(a)

Whenever the grounds for a resident’s discharge, transfer, or relocation are being challenged, the remedies created by this subchapter shall not be available in lieu of those established by subchapter III of this chapter. In all other cases, a person authorized to bring an action under this subchapter may do so notwithstanding the availability of other remedies, and prior exhaustion of administrative remedies shall not be required.

(b)

Any purported waiver of a person’s right to bring an action under this subchapter shall be void.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 405, 33 DCR 1510
1981 Ed., § 32-1455.